Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2479
Powers of surviving personal representative.

Unless the terms of the will otherwise provide, every power exercisable by personal corepresentatives may be exercised by the one or more remaining after the appointment of one or more is terminated, and if one of two or more nominated as coexecutors is not appointed, those appointed may exercise all the powers incident to the office.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 157, UPC § 3-718.